src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Pronouns
! ========


!Pointing to all the pronominal subgrops:
! *Personal 
! *Demonstrative 
! *Reflexive 
! *Reciprocal 
! *Interrogative 
! *Relative 
! *Indefinite 


! Personal pronoun
! -----------------

LEXICON persproncasesg
                    +Nom:å%>n      K ;
             +Use/NG+Nom:å%>nnå    K ; !betont
                    +Gen:u%>v      K ;
!             +Use/NG+Gen:u%>v      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
             +Use/NG+Gen:u%>vva    K ; !!betont
                    +Acc:u%>v      K ;
             +Use/NG+Acc:u%>vva    K ; !!betont
                    +Ill:u%>nji    K ;
                    +Ine:u%>jna    K ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>ne     K ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>jne    K ; !dial
                    +Ela:u%>jsta   K ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>jste   K ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>sta    K ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>ste    K ; !dial
                    +Par:u%>nnut   K ;
                    +Com:u%>jna    K ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Com:u%>jne    K ; !dial
                    +Abe:u%>v#dá   K ;
                    +Abe:u%>v#da   K ;
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tá   K ;
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dak  K ; !
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagi K ; !
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagá K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tagá K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dá    K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#da    K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dak   K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dagi  K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dagá  K ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#tagá  K ; !

LEXICON persproncasesgII
                   +Nom:å%>n      K ;
            +Use/NG+Nom:å%>dnå    K ; !betont
                   +Gen:u%>v      K ;
!            +Use/NG+Gen:u%>v      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
            +Use/NG+Gen:u%>vva    K ; !betont
                   +Acc:u%>v      K ;
            +Use/NG+Acc:u%>vva    K ; ! betont
                   +Ill:u%>nji    K ;
                   +Ine:u%>jna    K ;
 +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>ne     K ; !dial
                   +Ela:u%>jsta   K ;
            +Use/NG+Ela:u%>jste   K ; !dial
 +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>ste    K ; !dial
                   +Par:u%>nnut   K ;
                   +Com:u%>jna    K ;
                   +Abe:u%>vdá    K ;
                   +Abe:u%>vda    K ;
           +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tá   K ;
            +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dak  K ; !
            +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagi K ; !
            +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagá K ; !
           +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tagá K ; !
           +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>vdaga  K ; !

LEXICON persproncasedu
                   +Nom:åj%>        K ;
            +Use/NG+Nom:ådja%>      K ; !betont
                   +Gen:unnu%>      K ;
!            +Use/NG+Gen:unnu%>      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
                   +Acc:unnu%>v     K ;
                   +Ill:unnu%>j     K ;
 +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ill:unnu%>jna   K ; !dial
                   +Ine:unnu%>n     K ;
                   +Ela:unnu%>s     K ;
                   +Com:unnu%>jn    K ;
                   +Abe:unnu%>#da   K ;
            +Use/NG+Abe:unnu%>#dak  K ; !
            +Use/NG+Abe:unnu%>#dagi K ; !
            +Use/NG+Abe:unnu%>#dagá K ; !
           +Err/Orth+Abe:unnu%>#tagá K ; !

LEXICON persproncasepl
         +Nom:ij%>        K ;
  +Use/NG+Nom:idja%>      K ; !betont
         +Gen:ijá%>       K ;
!  +Use/NG+Gen:ijá%>       NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Acc:ijá%>v      K ;
         +Ill:idji%>j     K ;
         +Ine:ijá%>n      K ;
         +Ela:ijá%>s      K ;
         +Com:ijá%>jn     K ;
         +Abe:ijá%>#da    K ;
  +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>#dak   K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>#dagi  K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>#dagá  K ; !
+Err/Orth+Abe:ijá%>#tagá  K ; !
  +Use/NG+Gen:ijá%>j      K ;  !Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
!  +Use/NG+Gen:ijá%>j      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
  +Use/NG+Acc:ijá%>jt     K ; !
  +Use/NG+Ill:idji%>jda   K ; !
  +Use/NG+Ill:ijá%>jda    K ; !
  +Use/NG+Ine:ijá%>jn     K ; !
  +Use/NG+Ela:ijá%>js     K ; !
  +Use/NG+Com:ijá%>j      K ; !
         +Abe:ijá%>j#da   K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>j#dak  K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>j#dagi K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>j#dagá K ; !
 +Err/Orth+Abe:ijá%>j#tagá K ; !


LEXICON datcas ! Used for personal pron "dat" the demonstrative dat goes to "demcas"
 +Sg3:0 datcassg ;
 +Pl3:0 datcaspl ;

! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON demcas
 +Sg:0 demcassg ;
 +Pl:0 demcaspl ;

LEXICON demcassg 
              +Nom:t      K ;
       +Use/NG+Nom:hta    K ; !betong
              +Gen:n      K ;
!       +Use/NG+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; !why here? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
              +Acc:v      K ;
       +Use/NG+Acc:vva    K ; !betont
             +Ill:si      K ;
             +Ine:n0na    K ; ! was: n'n
       +Use/NG+Ine:nne    K ; !dial
              +Ela:ssta   K ;
       +Use/NG+Ela:sste   K ; !dial
!      +Use/NG+Ela:sstága K ; !Can't find this anywhere. Maybe this is really dástága/dastagá? in "dáhtakcas"
              +Com:jna    K ;
              +Ess:nen    K ;
              +Par:t      K ;
!             +Abe:n#da   K ; !dandá and duonda dosn't exist
              +Abe:bdá    K ;
       +Abe+Use/NG:n#dak  K ; !
       +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K ; !
       +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K ; !
      +Abe+Err/Orth:n#tagá K ; !
         +Gen+Attr:n      K ;
         +Ine+Attr:n      K ;
         +Ill+Attr:n      K ;
         +Ela+Attr:t      K ; ! 
 +Err/Orth+Ela+Attr:n      K ; ! This is ungrammatical, "dán goades" should be "dát goades"
 +Err/Orth+Gen+Attr:       K ; ! This is ungrammatical, "dá jage" should be "dán jage"

LEXICON demcaspl
        +Nom:   K ;
 +Use/NG+Nom:ha K ; !betont
            :j  demcasplobl ;

LEXICON demcasplobl
         +Gen:        K ;
!  +Use/NG+Gen:        NAMÁK ; !why here? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Acc:t       K ;
    +Acc+Attr:t       K ;
         +Ill:da      K ;
         +Ine:n       K ;
         +Ela:s       K ;
  +Use/NG+Ela:sta     K ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Ela:ste # ; !dial dajste, dájste, duojste
! +Use/NG+Ela:stága   # ; !!Can't find this anywhere. Maybe this is really dástága/dastagá? in "dáhtakcas"

         +Com:        K ;
    +Com+Attr:        K ;
  !      +Abe:#da     K ;
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dak    K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagi   K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagá   K ; !
 +Err/Orth+Abe:#tagá   K ; !

LEXICON datcassg 
         +Nom:t      K ;
  +Use/NG+Nom:hta    K ; !
         +Gen:n      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Acc:v      K ;
  +Use/NG+Acc:vva    K ; !betong
         +Ill:si     K ;
         +Ine:n0na   K ; ! was: n'n
  +Use/NG+Ine:nne    K ; !dial
         +Ela:ssta   K ;
  +Use/NG+Ela:sste   K ; ! dial
! +Use/NG+Ela:sstága K ; !Can't find this anywhere. Maybe this is really dástága/dastagá? in "dáhtakcas"
         +Com:jna    K ;
         +Ess:nen    K ;
         +Par:t      K ;
  !      +Abe:n#da   K ;
         +Abe:bdá    K ;
  +Abe+Use/NG:n#dak  K ; !
  +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K ; !
  +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K ; !
 +Abe+Err/Orth:n#tagá K ; !

LEXICON datcaspl
 +Nom: K ;
 +Nom+Use/NG:ha K ; !
 :j datcasplobl ;

LEXICON datcasplobl
         +Gen:      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Gen:      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Acc:t     K ;
         +Ill:da    K ;
         +Ine:n     K ;
         +Ela:s     K ;
  +Use/NG+Ela:sta   K ; !
  +Use/NG+Ela:ste # ; !dial dajste, dájste, duojste
         +Com:      K ;
  !      +Abe:#da   K ;
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dak  K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagi K ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagá K ; !
 +Err/Orth+Abe:#tagá K ; !

LEXICON dáhtakcas ! Grundstöm and Spiik
!        +Sg+Nom:hta    K ; !
          +Sg+Nom:hta   K-posneg  ;
          +Sg+Gen:ŋ     ga-posneg ;
+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ŋgas  #         ; ! ?
+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:ŋgas  #         ; ! ?
          +Sg+Acc:v     ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Ill:si    ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Ine:nná   ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Ela:stá   ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Com:jna   K-posneg  ;
          +Sg+Par:t     ga-posneg ;
 
LEXICON dakkárcase
           +Attr:        K ;
!    +Use/NG+Attr:        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Sg+Nom:        K ;
         +Sg+Gen:a       K ;
         +Sg+Acc:av      K ;
         +Sg+Ill:ij      K ;
         +Sg+Ine:in      K ;
         +Sg+Ela:is      K ;
         +Sg+Com:ijn     K ;
         +Pl+Nom:a       K ;
         +Pl+Gen:ij      K ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ij      NAMÁK ; !
         +Pl+Acc:ijt     K ;
         +Pl+Ill:ijda    K ;
         +Pl+Ine:ijn     K ;
         +Pl+Ela:ijs     K ;
         +Pl+Com:ij      K ;
            +Ess:in      K ;
         +Sg+Abe:a#da    K ; !
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:a#dak   K ; !
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:a#dagi  K ; !
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:a#dagá  K ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:a#tagá  K ; !
         +Pl+Abe:ij#da   K ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ij#dak  K ; !
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ij#dagi K ; !
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ij#dagá K ; !
  +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:ij#tagá K ; !

LEXICON duobbacase
!         +Attr:bba%>        K ;
        +Sg+Nom:bba%>        K ;
        +Sg+Gen:ppa%>        K ;
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:ppa%>        K ;
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:ppa%>        K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ppa%>        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
        +Sg+Acc:ppa%>v       K ;
        +Sg+Ill:bba%>j       K ;
        +Sg+Ine:ppa%>n       K ;
        +Sg+Ela:ppa%>s       K ;
        +Sg+Com:ppa%>jn      K ;
        +Pl+Nom:ppa%>        K ;
        +Pl+Gen:ppa%>j       K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ppa%>j       NAMÁK ; !
        +Pl+Acc:ppa%>jt      K ;
        +Pl+Ill:ppa%>jda     K ;
        +Pl+Ine:ppa%>jn      K ;
        +Pl+Ela:ppa%>js      K ;
        +Pl+Com:ppa%>j       K ;
           +Ess:bba%>n       K ;
        +Sg+Abe:ppa%>#da     K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dak    K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dagi   K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dagá   K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:ppa%>#tagá  K ; !
         +Pl+Abe:ppa%>j#da   K ;
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dak  K ; !
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dagi K ; !
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dagá K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ppa%>j#tagá K ; !


! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------
